Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7001.01
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that private citizens and charitable organizations have donated and granted funds to the department to pay for definitive diagnostic procedures for women whose abnormal test results have been discovered through the department's program for early detection of breast and cervical cancer. The Legislature recognizes the generosity of its citizens and charitable organizations who donate their time and money to provide funds to their fellow citizens.

It is the intent of the Legislature to permit the department to obtain and expend such funds to pay for definitive diagnostic procedures for women enrolled in the program.

Laws 1995, LB 68, § 4.